District of Columbia statutes.
47-1812.15

Repealed

“Person” defined.

Repealed.

July 16, 1947, 61 Stat. 356, ch. 258, art. I, title XII, § 14
Oct. 31, 1969, 83 Stat. 177, Pub. L. 91-106, title VI, § 603(a)
Sept. 13, 1980, D.C. Law 3-95, § 108, 27 DCR 3509
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(cc)(2), 48 DCR 334
1981 Ed., § 47-1812.15.
1973 Ed., § 47-1586m.
Section 410(e) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(b), (d), (f), (l), (n), (o), (r), (v), (x)through (aa), (cc), (ff), (gg), (ll), (pp), (vv), (ww), (aaa), (ccc), (eee), and (ggg) shall apply as of January 1, 2001.”